New Jersey, session 221, A4288.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, commencing on the effective date of this section, the Department of Environmental Protection shall not charge a fee to any municipality for any permit, approval, or other authorization necessary to construct or repair flood control facilities, or repair damage to roads, buildings, or other structures sustained in the municipality due to a natural disaster involving flooding. b.  To be eligible for the fee exemption provided pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the municipality shall demonstrate to the Department of Environmental Protection, in a form and manner as determined by the department, that the permit, approval, or other authorization is necessary to repair damage sustained due to a natural disaster. c.  No later than 90 days after the effective date of this section, the department shall publish a notice in the New Jersey Register, and post in a prominent location on the departments Internet website, the form and manner for a municipality to apply for the fee exemption provided pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  The department shall also provide this information to the Department of Community Affairs and shall compile the information for distribution to municipalities following a natural disaster. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.